District of Columbia statutes.
47-123

Chief Clerk of Auditor’s office.

The Chief Clerk of the Auditor’s Office shall, in the necessary absence or inability from any cause of the Auditor, perform his duties without additional compensation, and shall during the presence of the Auditor perform such duties as shall be prescribed by the Auditor; and the Council of the District of Columbia may require the said Chief Clerk to give bond for the faithful performance of such duties; but the Auditor shall in every respect be responsible to the United States, the District of Columbia, and to individuals, as now provided by law.

Aug. 6, 1890, 26 Stat. 295, ch. 724
Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 969, ch. 192
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-123.
1973 Ed., § 47-122.